Colorado, session 2026A, HB1007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) With weather-related power outages on the rise, distributed
generation systems, such as residential solar energy systems, create a clean,
reliable energy source that, especially when paired with an energy storage
system, is less vulnerable to natural disasters and grid failures;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Customers across the state are increasingly wanting to have more
freedom and choice over their energy decisions and to increase the
self-reliance and self-sufficiency of their families and communities;
(c) Portable-scale solar generation devices plug in directly to a wall
outlet and immediately provide energy to a home. These devices can play
a meaningful role in addressing energy affordability statewide, and they are
ideal for any small space, such as an apartment balcony or a small patio.
(d) While clean energy technologies, including portable-scale solar
generation devices, are becoming increasingly available for customers,
interconnection fees and other utility processes can make the adoption of
such technologies unnecessarily costly and burdensome;
(e) It is the policy of the state and the intent of the general assembly
to encourage the use of portable-scale solar generation devices and to limit
obstacles to customers' use of these devices; and
(f) Increasing renewable energy generation and allowing customers
across the state to have more freedom, choice, and self-sufficiency over
their energy decisions through the use of portable-scale solar generation
devices is a matter of statewide concern.
(2) The general assembly further finds that:
(a) Customer-sited distributed energy resources, including rooftop
solar and energy storage, are important tools to help customers manage
bills, improve resilience, and support achievement of the state's clean
energy and climate goals;
(b) UL labeling and listing, building codes, and fire codes ensure
consumer safety for renewable energy devices;
(c) Ensuring efficient, low-cost, and timely interconnection of
distributed energy resources is a matter of statewide concern;
(d) Use of meter collar adapters can reduce or avoid costly and
time-consuming service panel upgrades when interconnecting distributed
energy resources, thereby lowering the costs of and barriers to
customer-sited distributed energy resources for households and small
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

businesses;
(e) Cooperative electric associations are required to comply with the
interconnection rules adopted by the public utilities commission, and
municipally owned utilities are required to adopt interconnection standards
that are functionally similar to those established by the public utilities
commission;
(f) However, existing law does not explicitly require that
cooperative electric associations and municipally owned utilities must allow
for customer use of meter collar adapters; and
(g) Therefore, additional statutory direction is needed to ensure that
all utilities in the state fully and efficiently accommodate the use of meter
collar adapters.
(3) The general assembly further finds that requiring separate
production meters for customer-sited distributed energy resources in
circumstances where net energy consumption can be accurately measured
at the customer's billing meter adds unnecessary cost and complexity that
discourage beneficial distributed energy resources.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-2-140 as
follows:
40-2-140. Portable-scale solar generation devices - requirements
- exemptions - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) "COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 38-33.3-103 (8).
(b) "ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 38-33.3-106.7 (1)(b).
(c) "LIMITED COMMON ELEMENT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 38-33.3-103 (19).
(d) "PERSON" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 2-4-401 (8).
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

(e) "PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE" OR "DEVICE"
MEANS A SINGLE PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM PER ADDRESS AND ASSOCIATED
EQUIPMENT THAT:
(I) IS DESIGNED OR COMMISSIONED TO SUPPLY A MAXIMUM POWER
OUTPUT OF NOT MORE THAN ONE THOUSAND NINE HUNDRED TWENTY WATTS
TO THE ELECTRIC GRID; AND
(II) IS LABELED AND LISTED BY A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TESTING
LABORATORY.
(2) A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE MUST INCLUDE
A FEATURE THAT PREVENTS THE DEVICE FROM ENERGIZING THE ELECTRIC
GRID DURING A POWER OUTAGE.
(3) A CUSTOMER THAT USES A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION
DEVICE SHALL NOT CONNECT MORE THAN ONE DEVICE TO A SINGLE WALL
OUTLET PER ADDRESS.
(4) (a) A PROVIDER OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE OR WHOLESALE
ENERGY SHALL NOT REQUIRE A CUSTOMER TO:
(I) OBTAIN THE PROVIDER'S APPROVAL BEFORE INSTALLING OR USING
A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE;
(II) PAY THE PROVIDER A FEE RELATED TO A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR
GENERATION DEVICE; OR
(III) INSTALL ANY ADDITIONAL CONTROLS OR EQUIPMENT BEYOND
WHAT IS INTEGRATED INTO A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE
PURSUANT TO THE UL LISTING OF THE DEVICE.
(b) A PROVIDER OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE OR WHOLESALE
ENERGY MAY REQUIRE A CUSTOMER TO NOTIFY THE PROVIDER OF THE
CUSTOMER'S USE OF A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE BY
INDICATING THE PRESENCE AND SIZE OF THE DEVICE IN KILOWATTS.
(5) A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE THAT HAS A
POWER OUTPUT OF NOT MORE THAN THREE HUNDRED NINETY-ONE WATTS IS
EXEMPT FROM:
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

(a) THE SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC INSTALLATION REQUIREMENTS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-2-128; AND
(b) ANY BUILDING SAFETY CODE PROVISIONS OR PRODUCT LISTING
PROVISIONS THAT WOULD REQUIRE ALTERATIONS TO THE BUILDING'S
ELECTRICAL WIRING.
(6) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON SHALL NOT SELL,
LEASE, OR RENT A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE THAT HAS
A POWER OUTPUT OF MORE THAN THREE HUNDRED NINETY-ONE WATTS IN
THE STATE AND IS NOT UL LABELED AND LISTED.
(7) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027:
(a) A PERSON SHALL NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY UNREASONABLY
PROHIBIT THE INSTALLATION, USE, OR OPERATION OF A PORTABLE-SCALE
SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE;
(b) A COVENANT OR RESTRICTION THAT EXPLICITLY OR INDIRECTLY
UNREASONABLY PROHIBITS OR RESTRICTS THE INSTALLATION, USE, OR
OPERATION OF A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE IS
UNENFORCEABLE AND VOID AS A MATTER OF PUBLIC POLICY;
(c) A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE IS CONSIDERED
AN ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURE FOR THE PURPOSES OF SECTION
38-33.3-106.7; EXCEPT THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 38-33.3-106.7
(3)(d), A REAL PROPERTY OWNER MAY INSTALL, USE, OR OPERATE A DEVICE
ON REAL PROPERTY THAT IS A LIMITED COMMON ELEMENT OF A COMMON
INTEREST COMMUNITY;
(d) A REAL PROPERTY OWNER MAY REQUIRE REASONABLE
RESTRICTIONS FOR THE INSTALLATION, USE, OR OPERATION OF A
PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE, INCLUDING REQUIRING PRIOR
NOTICE OF THE INSTALLATION OF A DEVICE AND RESTRICTIONS RELATED TO
PREVENTING FIRE OR ELECTRICAL OVERLOAD OF THE EXISTING ELECTRICAL
SYSTEM, PREVENTING DAMAGE OR HARM TO A PERSON OR PROPERTY, AND
THE LOCATION OF THE DEVICE; AND
(e) A REAL PROPERTY OWNER THAT RESIDES IN A COMMON INTEREST
COMMUNITY AND INSTALLS A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

MAY BE REQUIRED TO REASONABLY SECURE THE DEVICE TO THEIR UNIT OR
ANY LIMITED COMMON ELEMENT PATIO, DECK, OR BALCONY THAT SOLELY
SERVES THE REAL PROPERTY OWNER'S UNIT. THE REAL PROPERTY OWNER
MAY BE RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL LIABILITY AND COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
INSTALLATION, MAINTENANCE, OR REMOVAL OF THE DEVICE AND REQUIRED
TO INDEMNIFY THE COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION AND OTHER OWNERS FROM
ANY RELATED LIABILITY OR COSTS.
(8) A PROVIDER OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE OR WHOLESALE
ENERGY IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGE OR INJURY CAUSED BY A
PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICE.
(9) THE INSTALLATION OF A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR GENERATION
DEVICE MUST BE IN ACCORDANCE WITH FIRE CODE REQUIREMENTS AND
APPLICABLE LOCAL BUILDING CODES THAT PERTAIN TO HEALTH AND SAFETY.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-2-124, add (1.3),
(1.4), and (7)(c) as follows:
40-2-124. Renewable energy standards - qualifying retail and
wholesale utilities - definitions - net metering - legislative declaration
- rules.
(1.3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REVISE EXISTING RULES TO:
(a) REQUIRE A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO POST AND MAINTAIN
ON ITS WEBSITE A PUBLIC LIST OF AT LEAST ONE METER COLLAR ADAPTER
THAT IS APPROVED BY THE QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY;
(b) (I) REQUIRE A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO HAVE A PROCESS
FOR APPROVING A CUSTOMER-OWNED METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT IS NOT
INCLUDED IN THE PUBLIC LIST MAINTAINED BY THE QUALIFYING RETAIL
UTILITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.3)(a) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH
PROCESS MUST TAKE NO MORE THAN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF
SUBMISSION FOR APPROVAL OF A SPECIFIC METER COLLAR ADAPTER BY THE
PROPOSING PARTY.
(II) A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY SHALL APPROVE A PROPOSED
CUSTOMER-OWNED METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT:
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

(A) IS CERTIFIED FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARDS
REFERENCED IN UL 414;
(B) IS PHYSICALLY AND ELECTRICALLY COMPATIBLE WITH THE UL
LISTINGS OF EXISTING EQUIPMENT AT THE INSTALLATION LOCATION AND
MEETS ALL NATIONAL ELECTRIC CODE CLEARANCE AND SAFETY STANDARDS;
(C) IS RATED ADEQUATELY FOR THE CONNECTED EQUIPMENT THAT
IS USED FOR PURPOSES OF SOLAR, BATTERY STORAGE TECHNOLOGY,
ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGE, OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES; AND
(D) DOES NOT COMPROMISE THE STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY OF THE
METER ENCLOSURE OR INTERFERE WITH SAFE METER OPERATION.
(III) A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY MAY DENY A PROPOSED
CUSTOMER-OWNED METER COLLAR ADAPTER ONLY IF:
(A) THE PROPOSED METER COLLAR ADAPTER DOES NOT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1.3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(B) THE QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY PROVIDES WRITTEN NOTICE TO
THE PROPOSING PARTY THAT CLEARLY EXPLAINS WHY THE PROPOSED METER
COLLAR ADAPTER FAILS TO MEET SAFETY REQUIREMENTS AND EXPLAINS THE
DIFFERENCES BETWEEN THE PROPOSED METER COLLAR ADAPTER AND A
METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE QUALIFYING
RETAIL UTILITY.
(c) IF THE INSTALLATION OF AN APPROVED METER COLLAR ADAPTER
REQUIRES RELOCATION OF THE METER ENCLOSURE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE
METER HOUSING, REQUIRE A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO, UPON REQUEST
OF THE CUSTOMER, PROVIDE AN ESTIMATE OF THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THIS WORK, WHICH COSTS ARE THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE CUSTOMER.
NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO
MODIFY, RELOCATE, REPLACE, OR UPGRADE METERING INFRASTRUCTURE TO
ACCOMMODATE THE INSTALLATION OF A METER COLLAR ADAPTER.
(d) IF THE INSTALLATION OF AN APPROVED METER COLLAR ADAPTER
REQUIRES REMOVAL OF THE METER, ALLOW A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY
TO REQUIRE THAT THE INSTALLATION WORK BE PERFORMED BY THE
QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY OR A LICENSED ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR OR
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

OTHER THIRD PARTY APPROVED BY THE QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY IN A
TIMELY MANNER AND AT NO ADDITIONAL COST TO THE CUSTOMER;
(e) REQUIRE A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO ESTABLISH AND
PUBLISH IN THE QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY'S TARIFFS A PROCESS FOR A
CUSTOMER TO REQUEST AND INSTALL A METER COLLAR ADAPTER, WHICH
PROCESS MUST TAKE NO LONGER THAN THIRTY DAYS AND NOT BE UNDULY
BURDENSOME TO THE CUSTOMER; AND
(f) REQUIRE A QUALIFYING RETAIL UTILITY TO FACILITATE THE
INSTALLATION OF A METER COLLAR ADAPTER BY AN ELECTRICAL
CONTRACTOR REGISTERED WITH THE STATE ELECTRICAL BOARD PURSUANT
TO SECTION 12-115-110 AND REQUIRE THAT ALL ELECTRICAL WORK BE
PERFORMED BY A MASTER ELECTRICIAN, JOURNEYMAN ELECTRICIAN,
RESIDENTIAL WIREMAN, OR PROPERLY SUPERVISED APPRENTICE.
(1.4) FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (1.3) OF THIS SECTION,
"PROPOSING PARTY" MEANS A METER COLLAR ADAPTER MANUFACTURER.
(7) (c) (I) A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY SHALL POST AND
MAINTAIN ON ITS WEBSITE A PUBLIC LIST OF AT LEAST ONE METER COLLAR
ADAPTER THAT IS APPROVED BY THE MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY.
(II) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, A MUNICIPALLY OWNED
UTILITY'S INTERCONNECTION STANDARDS MUST:
(A) INCLUDE A PROCESS FOR APPROVING A CUSTOMER-OWNED
METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT IS NOT INCLUDED IN THE PUBLIC LIST
MAINTAINED BY THE MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH PROCESS MUST TAKE NO
MORE THAN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF SUBMISSION FOR APPROVAL
OF A SPECIFIC METER COLLAR ADAPTER BY THE PROPOSING PARTY;
(B) INCLUDE A PROCESS FOR A CUSTOMER TO REQUEST AND INSTALL
A METER COLLAR ADAPTER, WHICH PROCESS MUST TAKE NO LONGER THAN
THIRTY DAYS AND NOT BE UNDULY BURDENSOME TO THE CUSTOMER; AND
(C) ALLOW FOR THE INSTALLATION OF A METER COLLAR ADAPTER BY
A PROFESSIONAL CONTRACTOR WITH A VALID ELECTRICIAN LICENSE ISSUED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 115 OF TITLE 12.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

(III) A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY SHALL APPROVE A PROPOSED
CUSTOMER-OWNED METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT:
(A) IS CERTIFIED FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARDS
REFERENCED IN UL 414;
(B) IS PHYSICALLY AND ELECTRICALLY COMPATIBLE WITH THE UL
LISTINGS OF EXISTING EQUIPMENT AT THE INSTALLATION LOCATION AND
MEETS ALL NATIONAL ELECTRIC CODE CLEARANCE AND SAFETY STANDARDS;
(C) IS RATED ADEQUATELY FOR THE CONNECTED EQUIPMENT THAT
IS USED FOR PURPOSES OF SOLAR, BATTERY STORAGE TECHNOLOGY,
ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGE, OR ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES; AND
(D) DOES NOT COMPROMISE THE STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY OF THE
METER ENCLOSURE OR INTERFERE WITH SAFE METER OPERATION.
(IV) A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY MAY DENY A PROPOSED
CUSTOMER-OWNED METER COLLAR ADAPTER ONLY IF:
(A) THE PROPOSED METER COLLAR ADAPTER DOES NOT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (7)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(B) THE MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY PROVIDES WRITTEN NOTICE
TO THE PROPOSING PARTY THAT CLEARLY EXPLAINS WHY THE PROPOSED
METER COLLAR ADAPTER FAILS TO MEET SAFETY REQUIREMENTS AND
EXPLAINS THE DIFFERENCES BETWEEN THE PROPOSED METER COLLAR
ADAPTER AND A METER COLLAR ADAPTER THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE
MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY.
(V) IF THE INSTALLATION OF AN APPROVED METER COLLAR ADAPTER
REQUIRES RELOCATION OF THE METER ENCLOSURE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE
METER HOUSING, A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY SHALL, UPON REQUEST OF
THE CUSTOMER, PROVIDE AN ESTIMATE OF THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
NECESSARY LABOR AND EQUIPMENT OF THE MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY,
WHICH COSTS ARE THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE CUSTOMER. NOTHING IN THIS
SECTION REQUIRES A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY TO MODIFY, RELOCATE,
REPLACE, OR UPGRADE METERING INFRASTRUCTURE TO ACCOMMODATE THE
INSTALLATION OF A METER COLLAR ADAPTER.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

(VI) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (7)(c), "PROPOSING
PARTY" MEANS A METER COLLAR ADAPTER MANUFACTURER.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-9.5-118, amend
(2)(d) as follows:
40-9.5-118. Net metering - rules.
(2) Each cooperative electric association shall allow a
customer-generator's retail electricity consumption to be offset by the
electricity generated from eligible energy resources on the
customer-generator's side of the meter that are interconnected with the
facilities of the cooperative electric association, subject to the following:
(d) Interconnection standards. A cooperative electric association
and a customer-generator shall comply with the interconnection standards
and insurance requirements established in the rules promulgated ADOPTED
by the public utilities commission pursuant to section 40-2-124; except that
the cooperative electric association may reduce or waive any of the
insurance requirements; and except that the public utilities commission shall
initiate a rule-making proceeding no later than October 1, 2008, for the
purpose of addressing cooperative electric association system issues in its
small generator interconnection procedures. A cooperative electric
association shall not prevent or unreasonably burden the installation of a net
metering system if such system includes protective equipment that prevents
any export of customer-generated electricity from the customer's side of the
meter. A COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION AND A
CUSTOMER-GENERATOR SHALL COMPLY WITH THE RULES ADOPTED BY THE
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2-124 (1.3)
REGARDING METER COLLAR ADAPTERS AND WITH OTHER COMMISSION RULES
REGARDING PRODUCTION METERS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-33.3-106.7, amend
(1)(b)(V) and (1)(b)(VI); and add (1)(b)(VII) as follows:
38-33.3-106.7. Unreasonable restrictions on energy efficiency
measures - definitions.
(1) (b) As used in this section, "energy efficiency measure" means
a device or structure that reduces the amount of energy derived from fossil
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

fuels that is consumed by a residence or business located on the real
property. "Energy efficiency measure" is further limited to include only the
following types of devices or structures:
(V) A retractable clothesline; and
(VI) A heat pump system, as defined in section 39-26-732 (2)(c);
AND
(VII) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A PORTABLE-SCALE SOLAR
GENERATION DEVICE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 40-2-140 (1)(e).
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournmennt of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1007

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1007